District of Columbia statutes.
47-392.15

No full faith and credit of the United States.

The full faith and credit of the United States is not pledged for the payment of any principal of or interest on any bond, note, or other obligation issued by the Authority pursuant to this part. The United States is not responsible or liable for the payment of any principal of or interest on any bond, note, or other obligation issued by the Authority pursuant to this part.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 139, Pub. L. 104-8, § 215
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-392.15.